Hawaii, session 2026, SB3047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that financial literacy is a foundational life skill that supports long-term household stability, workforce readiness, and economic resilience. Personal financial education is essential to ensure that Hawaii's youth are prepared to manage money, credit, and debt and to become responsible workers, heads of households, investors, entrepreneurs, business leaders, and citizens. The legislature declares that financial literacy instruction can be efficiently scaled by embedding financial literacy content into existing courses that substantially align with financial literacy program standards, including but not limited to economics and business courses, thereby minimizing new course burdens while ensuring statewide access and consistency. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of education to integrate financial literacy instruction into existing courses identified as having sufficient overlap with financial literacy program standards and to provide professional development for teachers to implement the embedded instruction. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Financial literacy; public schools; existing courses; professional development. (a)  The department shall, beginning with the 2027 to 2028 school year, embed financial literacy instruction into existing department courses for public school students in grades nine through twelve, that the department determines to have sufficient overlap with financial literacy program standards, including but not limited to economics and business-related courses. (b)  No later than December 31, 2026, the department shall: (1)  Publish a list of existing courses identified pursuant to subsection (a); (2)  Ensure the embedded financial literacy instruction aligns with financial literacy program standards adopted or recognized by the department; and (3)  Publish implementation guidance for public high schools, including minimum content expectations and requirements for documentation of student completion. (c)  The board shall provide teachers with professional development to implement financial literacy instruction.  Professional development may include workshops, summer training, coaching, online modules, and instructional resources.  Teachers shall complete financial literacy professional development before implementing embedded financial literacy instruction pursuant to this section. (d)  The department may collaborate with public agencies and private or nonprofit partners to develop instructional materials and training resources; provided that the department shall ensure that instruction and materials remain noncommercial and free from advertising or product promotion. (e)  The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for: (1)  Professional development and training for teachers to implement financial literacy instruction embedded into existing courses pursuant to this Act; (2)  The development and adaptation of instructional resources aligned with financial literacy program standards; and (3)  Implementation support, including planning and coordination. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________